apertium-nn-nb.nb.dix
<pardef n="pint__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="t-shirt__n">
  <!-- RL since transfer might add definite -->
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="h/ånd__n">
  <e>       <p><l>endene</l>    <r>ånd<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ender</l>     <r>ånd<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ånda</l>      <r>ånd<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ånd</l>       <r>ånd<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>endene</l>    <r>ånd<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ender</l>     <r>ånd<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ånden</l>     <r>ånd<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ånd</l>       <r>ånd<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="hero/s__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sen</l>       <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_'__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="monstr/um__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>et</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>umet</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>         <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="taf/fel__n">
  <e>       <p><l>lene</l>      <r>fel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>fel</l>       <r>fel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ler</l>       <r>fel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>felet</l>     <r>fel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>let</l>       <r>fel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fel</l>       <r>fel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>la</l>        <r>fel<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="lir/e__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>er</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="portable__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="gerani/um__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>en</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>umen</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="PC__n">
  <e>       <p><l>-ene</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>'ene</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-er</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>'er</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-en</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>'en</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s_S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="displaced person"><i>displaced<b/>person</i><par n="t-shirt__n"/></e>
<e lm="t-shirt">         <i>t-shirt</i><par n="t-shirt__n"/></e>
<e lm="hånd">            <i>h</i><par n="h/ånd__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bushel"><i>bushel</i><par n="pint__n"/></e>
    <e lm="button"><i>button</i><par n="pint__n"/></e>
    <e lm="feedback"><i>feedback</i><par n="pint__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fitting"><i>fitting</i><par n="pint__n"/></e>
    <e lm="flashback"><i>flashback</i><par n="pint__n"/></e>
    <e lm="geranium"><i>gerani</i><par n="gerani/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lire"><i>lir</i><par n="lir/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="monstrum"><i>monstr</i><par n="monstr/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="paperback"><i>paperback</i><par n="pint__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pelargonium"><i>pelargoni</i><par n="gerani/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pint"><i>pint</i><par n="pint__n"/></e>
    <e lm="playback"><i>playback</i><par n="pint__n"/></e>
    <e lm="taffel"><i>taf</i><par n="taf/fel__n"/></e>
